New York, session 2025-2026, S6693.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 7001 of the education law, 2 subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 2013 and subdivi- 3 sion 2 as amended by chapter 438 of the laws of 2012, are amended to 4 read as follows: 5 1. The practice of the profession of podiatry is defined as diagnos- 6 ing, treating, operating and prescribing for any disease, injury, 7 deformity [or], other condition of, or local manifestations of systemic 8 diseases as they appear on the foot and the diagnosing, treating, and 9 prescribing for any disease, injury, deformity, other condition of, or 10 local manifestations of systemic diseases as they appear on the ankle, 11 unless otherwise provided by this section, and may include performing 12 physical evaluations in conjunction with the provision of podiatric 13 treatment. For the purposes of wound care however, the practice of 14 podiatry shall include the treatment of such wounds if they are contig- 15 uous with wounds relating, originating or in the course of treatment of 16 a wound on the foot or ankle within the podiatric scope of practice. 17 Wound care shall not[, however,] extend beyond the level ending at the 18 distal tibial tuberosity. The practice of podiatry may also include 19 [diagnosing, treating,] operating [and prescribing] for any disease, 20 injury, deformity or other condition of the ankle and soft tissue of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07128-09-5 S. 6693--B 2 1 leg below the tibial tuberosity if the podiatrist has obtained an issu- 2 ance of a privilege to perform podiatric standard ankle surgery or 3 advanced ankle surgery in accordance with section seven thousand nine of 4 this article. Podiatrists may treat traumatic open wound fractures only 5 in hospitals, as defined in article twenty-eight of the public health 6 law. For the purposes of this article, the term "ankle" shall be defined 7 as the distal metaphysis and epiphysis of the tibia and fibula, the 8 articular cartilage of the distal tibia and distal fibula, the ligaments 9 that connect the distal metaphysis and epiphysis of the tibia and fibula 10 and talus, and the portions of skin, subcutaneous tissue, facia, 11 muscles, tendons, ligaments and nerves at or below the level of the 12 myotendinous junction of the triceps surae. 13 2. The practice of podiatry shall not include treating any part of the 14 human body other than the foot or ankle, [nor treating fractures of the 15 malleoli or] provided, however, that unless the podiatrist obtains an 16 issuance of a privilege to perform podiatric standard ankle surgery or 17 podiatric advanced ankle surgery, such practice shall not include the 18 surgical treatment of fractures of the malleoli which includes cutting 19 operations upon the malleoli [unless the podiatrist obtains an issuance 20 of a privilege to perform podiatric standard ankle surgery or podiatric 21 advanced ankle surgery]. Podiatrists who have obtained an issuance of a 22 privilege to perform podiatric standard ankle surgery may perform 23 surgery on the ankle which may include soft tissue and osseous proce- 24 dures except those procedures specifically authorized for podiatrists 25 who have obtained an issuance of a privilege for advanced ankle surgery. 26 Podiatrists who have obtained an issuance of a privilege to perform 27 podiatric advanced ankle surgery may perform surgery on the ankle which 28 may include ankle fracture fixation, ankle fusion, ankle arthroscopy, 29 insertion or removal of external fixation pins into or from the tibial 30 diaphysis at or below the level of the myotendinous junction of the 31 triceps surae, and insertion and removal of retrograde tibiotalocalcan- 32 neal intramedullary rods and locking screws up to the level of the 33 myotendinous junction of the triceps surae, but does not include the 34 surgical treatment of complications within the tibial diaphysis related 35 to the use of such external fixation pins. Podiatrists licensed to prac- 36 tice, but not authorized to prescribe or administer narcotics prior to 37 the effective date of this subdivision, may do so only after certif- 38 ication by the department in accordance with the qualifications estab- 39 lished by the commissioner. The practice of podiatry shall include 40 administering only local anesthetics for therapeutic purposes as well as 41 for anesthesia and treatment under general anesthesia administered by 42 authorized persons. The practice of podiatry by any licensee shall not 43 include [partial or total ankle replacements nor] the treatment of pilon 44 fractures. 45 § 2. The opening paragraph of section 7010 of the education law is 46 designated subdivision 1 and subdivision 2, as added by chapter 438 of 47 the laws of 2012, is amended to read as follows: 48 2. (a) A limited permit to perform podiatric advanced ankle surgery, 49 as described in subdivision two of section seven thousand one of this 50 article, may be issued by the department, for the purposes of authoriz- 51 ing a podiatrist to obtain the training and experience required for the 52 issuance of a podiatric advanced ankle surgery privilege pursuant to 53 subdivision two of section seven thousand nine of this article, to a 54 podiatrist who: 55 (i) is licensed pursuant to this article and who has met the residency 56 and board certification requirements set forth in subdivision two of S. 6693--B 3 1 section seven thousand nine of this article [in order to authorize such 2 podiatrist to obtain the training and experience required for the issu- 3 ance of a podiatric advanced ankle surgery privilege pursuant to subdi- 4 vision two of section seven thousand nine of this article]; or 5 (ii) is licensed pursuant to this article and who has met the residen- 6 cy requirements set forth in subdivision two of section seven thousand 7 nine of this article and who is board qualified but not yet certified in 8 reconstructive rearfoot and ankle surgery by a national certifying board 9 having certification standards acceptable to the department. 10 (b) Such permits shall authorize the performance of podiatric advanced 11 ankle surgery only under the direct personal supervision of a licensed 12 podiatrist holding a podiatric advanced ankle surgery privilege issued 13 pursuant to subdivision two of section seven thousand nine of this arti- 14 cle or of a physician licensed pursuant to article one hundred thirty- 15 one of this title and certified in orthopedic surgery by a national 16 certifying board having certification standards acceptable to the 17 department. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect eighteen months after it shall have 19 become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 20 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 21 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 22 on or before such effective date.